District of Columbia statutes.
28-2109

Assignment to hinder or defraud creditors.

This chapter does not prevent a creditor otherwise entitled from attacking an assignment as made to hinder or defraud the creditors of the assignor. When the court finds an assignment to have been made with that intent, it may enjoin any proceeding thereunder, and upon finally decreeing the assignment to be void may appoint a trustee with power to take possession of all the property of the debtor, and may make and enforce all orders necessary to put him in possession of the property. The trustee shall qualify in the same manner and perform the same duties as the trustees provided for by this chapter.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 669, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Cross References

Fraudulent conveyances, see § 28-3101 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2109.
1973 Ed., § 28-2109.